Washington statutes.
RCW 43.19.1917

Records of equipment owned by state—Inspection—"State equipment" defined.

All state agencies, including educational institutions, shall maintain a perpetual record of ownership of state owned equipment, which shall be available for the inspection and check of those officers who are charged by law with the responsibility for auditing the records and accounts of the state organizations owning the equipment, or to such other special investigators and others as the governor may direct. In addition, these records shall be made available to members of the legislature, the legislative committees, and legislative staff on request.

All state agencies, including educational institutions, shall account to the office of financial management upon request for state equipment owned by, assigned to, or otherwise possessed by them and maintain such records as the office of financial management deems necessary for proper accountability therefor. The office of financial management shall publish a procedural directive for compliance by all state agencies, including educational institutions, which establishes a standard method of maintaining records for state owned equipment, including the use of standard state forms. This published directive also shall include instructions for reporting to the department all state equipment which is excess to the needs of state organizations owning such equipment. The term "state equipment" means all items of machines, tools, furniture, or furnishings other than expendable supplies and materials as defined by the office of financial management.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 214; 1979 c 88 s 3; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 21 s 9; 1969 ex.s. c 53 s 2; 1965 c 8 s 43.19.1917. Prior: 1959 c 178 s 9.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.